Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 4. Unlawful Acts and Penalties.

Administrative Code. —

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 04, art. 7.

Sec. 08.04.500.
Individual posing as a certified public accountant.

An individual may not assume or use the title or designation “certified public accountant” or the abbreviation “CPA” or any other title, designation, word, letter, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the individual is a certified public accountant, unless the individual has received a license and all of the individual’s offices in this state for the practice of public accounting are maintained as required by AS

08.04.360

—

08.04.380

.

This section does not prohibit an individual in good standing in any state, including an individual acting as a sole practitioner in the individual’s home state, holding a practice privilege under AS

08.04.420

from using the title “certified public accountant” or another title allowed under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 15(1) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 17 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 4 ch 62 SLA 1988; am § 34 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 22 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, in (a), substituted “AS

08.04.360

and

08.04.370

” for “AS

08.04.360

—

08.04.380

” at the end.

Sec. 08.04.500.
Individual posing as a certified public accountant.

An individual may not assume or use the title or designation “certified public accountant” or the abbreviation “CPA” or any other title, designation, word, letter, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the individual is a certified public accountant, unless the individual has received a license and all of the individual’s offices in this state for the practice of public accounting are maintained as required by AS

08.04.360

and

08.04.370

.

This section does not prohibit an individual in good standing in any state, including an individual acting as a sole practitioner in the individual’s home state, holding a practice privilege under AS

08.04.420

from using the title “certified public accountant” or another title allowed under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 15(1) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 17 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 4 ch 62 SLA 1988; am § 34 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 22 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 25 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.505.
Issuance of reports.

Only a person who holds a valid license, practice privilege, permit, or out-of-state exemption may issue a report on financial statements of another person or governmental unit. This restriction does not apply to

an officer, partner, member, or employee of a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity affixing that person’s signature to a statement or report in reference to the financial affairs of the sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity with wording designating the position, title, or office that the person holds in the sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity;

an act of a public official or employee in the performance of official duties;

the performance by persons of other services involving the use of accounting skills, including the preparation of tax returns, management advisory services, and the preparation of financial statements without the issuance of reports on them.

History.

(§ 14 ch 62 SLA 1991; am § 11 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 35 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 23 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, in the introductory language, substituted “or permit may issue” for “permit, or out-of-state exemption” following “practice privilege,” and “report on behalf of” for “report on financial statements” following “issue a”; in (1), substituted “firm” for “sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity” three times.

Sec. 08.04.505.
Issuance of reports.

Only a person who holds a valid license, practice privilege, or permit may issue a report on behalf of another person or governmental unit. This restriction does not apply to

an officer, partner, member, or employee of a firm affixing that person’s signature to a statement or report in reference to the financial affairs of the firm with wording designating the position, title, or office that the person holds in the firm;

an act of a public official or employee in the performance of official duties;

the performance by persons of other services involving the use of accounting skills, including the preparation of tax returns, management advisory services, and the preparation of financial statements without the issuance of reports on them.

History.

(§ 14 ch 62 SLA 1991; am § 11 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 35 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 23 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 26 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.510.
Partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity posing as a certified public accountant.

A partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity may not assume or use the title or designation “certified public accountant” or the abbreviation “CPA” or any other title, designation, word, letter, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that it is composed of certified public accountants, unless the partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity holds a permit or an out-of-state exemption and is engaging in the practice of public accounting under the name on its permit, and its offices in this state for the practice of public accounting are maintained as required by AS

08.04.360

—

08.04.380

.

A partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity consisting of certified public accountants in good standing in any state, that does not have a permit as a partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity consisting of certified public accountants under AS

08.04.240

but holds a permit under AS

08.04.421

or out-of-state exemption, may use the title or designation “certified public accountants” or another title permitted under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 15(2) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 18 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 6 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 5 ch 62 SLA 1988; am § 12 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 36 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 24 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, in (a), twice substituted “firm” for “partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity”, deleted “or an out-of-state exemption” following “holds a permit”, deleted “, and its offices in this state for the practice of public accounting are maintained as required by AS

08.04.360

—

08.04.380

” at the end; repealed (b).

Sec. 08.04.510.
Partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity posing as a certified public accountant.

A firm may not assume or use the title or designation “certified public accountant” or the abbreviation “CPA” or any other title, designation, word, letter, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that it is composed of certified public accountants, unless the firm holds a permit and is engaging in the practice of public accounting under the name on its permit.

[Repealed, § 44 ch 5 SLA 2022.]

History.

(§ 15(2) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 18 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 6 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 5 ch 62 SLA 1988; am § 12 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 36 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 24 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 27 ch 5 SLA 2022; am § 44 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.520.
Individual posing as public accountant.

An individual may not assume or use the title or designation “public accountant” or the abbreviation “PA” or other title, designation, word, letter, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the individual is a public accountant, unless the individual holds a current license or practice privilege and the individual’s offices in this state for the practice of public accounting are maintained as required by AS

08.04.360

—

08.04.380

.

History.

(§ 15(3) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 6 ch 62 SLA 1988; am § 37 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 25 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, substituted “AS

08.04.360

and

08.04.370

” for “AS

08.04.360

—

08.04.380

” at the end.

Sec. 08.04.520.
Individual posing as public accountant.

An individual may not assume or use the title or designation “public accountant” or the abbreviation “PA” or other title, designation, word, letter, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the individual is a public accountant, unless the individual holds a current license or practice privilege and the individual’s offices in this state for the practice of public accounting are maintained as required by AS

08.04.360

and

08.04.370

.

History.

(§ 15(3) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 6 ch 62 SLA 1988; am § 37 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 25 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 28 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.530.
Partnership, limited liability company, or corporation posing as public accountant.

A partnership, limited liability company, or corporation may not assume or use the designation “public accountant” or the abbreviation “PA” or any other title, designation, word, letter, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the partnership, limited liability company, or corporation is composed of public accountants, unless the partnership, limited liability company, or corporation holds a current permit or out-of-state exemption, and, if it has a permit, is practicing under the name on its permit, and its office in this state for the practice of public accounting is maintained as required by AS

08.04.360

—

08.04.380

.

History.

(§ 15(4) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 19 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 7 ch 62 SLA 1988; am § 13 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 38 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 26 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, substituted “firm” for “partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity” three times, deleted “or out-of-state exemption, and, if it has a permit” following “a current permit”, and substituted “AS

08.04.360

and

08.04.370

” for “AS

08.04.360

—

08.04.380

” at the end.

Sec. 08.04.530.
Firm posing as public accountant.

A firm may not assume or use the designation “public accountant” or the abbreviation “PA” or any other title, designation, word, letter, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the firm is composed of public accountants, unless the firm holds a current permit, is practicing under the name on its permit, and its office in this state for the practice of public accounting is maintained as required by AS

08.04.360

and

08.04.370

.

History.

(§ 15(4) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 19 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 7 ch 62 SLA 1988; am § 13 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 38 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 26 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 29 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.540.
Use of deceptive title or abbreviation.

An individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity may not assume or use the title or designation “certified accountant,” “chartered accountant,” “enrolled accountant,” “licensed accountant,” “registered accountant,” or any other title or designation likely to be confused with “certified public accountant” or “public accountant,” or any of the abbreviations “C,” “EA,” “LA,” “RA,” or similar abbreviations likely to be confused with “CPA” or “PA” except that “EA” may be used to the extent that it relates to the term “enrolled agent” as defined by the federal Internal Revenue Service; however, an individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity holding a current license or permit or an out-of-state exemption or practice privilege, and whose offices in this state for the practice of public accounting, if any, are maintained as required by AS

08.04.360

—

08.04.380

may hold out to the public as an accountant or auditor.

History.

(§ 15(5) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 20 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 8 ch 62 SLA 1988; am § 14 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 12 SLA 1997; am § 39 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 27 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7,2022, in the first sentence, substituted “or firm” for “, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity” near the beginning. In the second sentence, deleted “, partnership, limited liability company, corporation” near the beginning, substituted “or firm” for “or other legal entity, deleted “or an out-of-state exemption” following “permit,”, substituted “AS

08.04.360

and

08.04.370

” for “AS

08.04.360

—

08.04.380

”, and made related changes.

Sec. 08.04.540.
Use of deceptive title or abbreviation.

An individual or firm may not assume or use the title or designation “certified accountant,” “chartered accountant,” “enrolled accountant,” “licensed accountant,” “registered accountant,” or any other title or designation likely to be confused with “certified public accountant” or “public accountant,” or any of the abbreviations “C,” “EA,” “LA,” “RA,” or similar abbreviations likely to be confused with “CPA” or “PA” except that “EA” may be used to the extent that it relates to the term “enrolled agent” as defined by the federal Internal Revenue Service. However, an individual or firm holding a current license, permit, or practice privilege and whose offices in this state for the practice of public accounting, if any, are maintained as required by AS

08.04.360

and

08.04.370

may hold out to the public as an accountant or auditor.

History.

(§ 15(5) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 20 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 8 ch 62 SLA 1988; am § 14 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 12 SLA 1997; am § 39 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 27 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 30 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.550.
Corporation may not assume title. [Repealed, § 21 ch 147 SLA 1976. For current law, see AS 08.04.540.]

Sec. 08.04.560.
Individual may not assume title.

An individual may not sign or affix any name or any trade or assumed name used by that individual to any accounting or financial statement or opinion or report on any accounting or financial statement with any wording indicating that the person is a certified public accountant or public accountant or with any wording indicating that the person has expert knowledge in accounting or auditing, unless the individual holds a current license or practice privilege and the individual’s offices in this state, if any, for the practice of public accounting are maintained as required by AS

08.04.360

—

08.04.380

.

History.

(§ 15(7) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 9 ch 62 SLA 1988; am § 40 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 28 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, deleted “on any accounting or financial statement” following “or opinion or report”, and deleted “and the individual’s offices in this state, if any, for the practice of public accounting are maintained as required by AS

08.04.360

—

08.04.380

” at the end.

Sec. 08.04.560.
Individual may not assume title.

An individual may not sign or affix any name or any trade or assumed name used by that individual to any accounting or financial statement or opinion or report with any wording indicating that the person is a certified public accountant or public accountant or with any wording indicating that the person has expert knowledge in accounting or auditing, unless the individual holds a current license or practice privilege.

History.

(§ 15(7) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 9 ch 62 SLA 1988; am § 40 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 28 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 31 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.565.
Prohibited acts.

An individual licensed under AS

08.04.105

may not perform attest functions through a partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other business entity unless the partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other business entity holds a valid permit issued under AS

08.04.240

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, twice substituted “firm” for “partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other business entity”.

Effective dates. —

Section 4,
ch. 74, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on October 31, 2018.

Sec. 08.04.565.
Prohibited acts.

An individual licensed under AS

08.04.105

may not perform attest functions through a firm unless the firm holds a valid permit issued under AS

08.04.240

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 2018; am § 32 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.570.
Acts not prohibited.

AS

08.04.560

does not prohibit

an officer, employee, partner, member, or principal of any organization from affixing that person’s signature to any statement or report in reference to the financial affairs of the organization together with any wording designating the position, title, or office which that person holds;

an act of a public official or public employee in the performance of that person’s duties;

a person maintaining a bookkeeping or tax service from affixing that person’s signature to any record, statement, or report maintained or prepared by the person.

History.

(§ 15(7) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 15 ch 29 SLA 1996)

Sec. 08.04.580.
Partnership posing as accountants or auditors.

History.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 74 SLA 2018.]

Sec. 08.04.590.
Use of title with corporate name.

History.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 74 SLA 2018.]

Sec. 08.04.595.
Use of title with limited liability company name.

History.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 74 SLA 2018.]

Sec. 08.04.598.
Use of title with name of other legal entity.

History.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 74 SLA 2018.]

Sec. 08.04.600.
Disclosure of lack of license or permit.

An individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other entity that does not hold a current license, a current practice privilege, a current permit, or a current out-of-state exemption, may not hold out to the public as a certified public accountant or public accountant by use of such words or abbreviations on any sign, card, or letterhead, or in any advertisement or directory, without indicating that the individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other entity does not hold a current license, a current practice privilege, or a current permit. This section does not prohibit

an officer, employee, partner, member, or principal of an organization from self-description through the position, title, or office that the person holds in the organization;

an act of a public official or public employee in the performance of that individual’s duties; or

a person from maintaining a bookkeeping or tax service.

History.

(§ 15(10) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 23 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 17 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 45 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 33 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, in the introductory language, twice substituted “individual or firm” for “individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other entity”, deleted “or a current out-of-state exemption,” following “a current permit, and made related and stylistic changes.

Sec. 08.04.600.
Disclosure of lack of license or permit.

An individual or firm that does not hold a current license, a current practice privilege, or a current permit may not hold out to the public as a certified public accountant or public accountant by use of those words or abbreviations on any sign, card, or letterhead, or in any advertisement or directory, without indicating that the individual or firm does not hold a current license, a current practice privilege, or a current permit. This section does not prohibit

an officer, employee, partner, member, or principal of an organization from self-description through the position, title, or office that the person holds in the organization;

an act of a public official or public employee in the performance of that individual’s duties; or

a person from maintaining a bookkeeping or tax service.

History.

(§ 15(10) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 23 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 17 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 45 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 33 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 33 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.610.
Deceptive use of title or designation by partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity.

A person may not assume or use the title or designation “certified public accountant” or “public accountant” or an abbreviation of them, in conjunction with a name indicating or implying that there is a partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other entity, or in conjunction with the designation “and Company,” “and Co.,” “L.L.C.,” “LLC,” “Ltd.,” or any similar designation unless there is a bona fide partnership, limited liability company, corporation, other legal entity holding a permit issued under that name, or a current out-of-state exemption. However, a sole proprietor or partnership lawfully using the title or designation “certified public accountant” or “public accountant” or an abbreviation of them in conjunction with such names or designation on April 26, 1960, may continue to do so if the person or partnership otherwise complies with this chapter.

History.

(§ 15(11) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 24 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 18 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 46 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 34 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, twice substituted “firm” for “partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other entity”, deleted “, or a current out-of-state exemption” following “under that name, and made related and stylistic changes.

Sec. 08.04.610.
Deceptive use of title or designation byfirm.

A person may not assume or use the title or designation “certified public accountant” or “public accountant” or an abbreviation of them in conjunction with a name indicating or implying that there is a firm, or in conjunction with the designation “and Company,” “and Co.,” “L.L.C.,” “LLC,” “Ltd.,” or any similar designation, unless there is a bona fide firm holding a permit issued under that name. However, a sole proprietor or partnership lawfully using the title or designation “certified public accountant” or “public accountant” or an abbreviation of them in conjunction with those names or designation on April 26, 1960, may continue to do so if the person or partnership otherwise complies with this chapter.

History.

(§ 15(11) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 24 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 18 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 46 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 34 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 34 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.620.
Exceptions.

This chapter does not prohibit

an individual who does not hold a current license or practice privilege from serving as an employee of or as an assistant to an individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity holding a current license, a current practice privilege, a current permit, or a current out-of-state exemption so long as the employee or assistant does not use the employee’s or the assistant’s name in connection with an accounting or financial statement;

an individual who holds a valid license or equivalent authorization in another state from indicating that the individual is entitled to use the title “certified public accountant,” but the individual may not indicate that services are available to the public unless the individual holds a current license or practice privilege issued under this chapter;

a holder of a certificate, license, or degree from a foreign country that constitutes a recognized qualification for the practice of public accounting in that country from indicating that the person holds the certificate, license, or degree, but the person may not indicate that the person’s services are available to the public unless the person holds a current license, practice privilege, permit, or out-of-state exemption under this chapter.

History.

(§ 16 ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 25 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 19 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 47 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 35 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, in (1), substituted “individual or firm” for “individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity” following “assistant to an”, substituted “permit if” for “permit, or a current out-of-state exemption so long as” following “a current”, rewrote (3), which read, “a holder of a certificate, license, or degree from a foreign country that constitutes a recognized qualification for the practice of public accounting in that country from indicating that the person holds the certificate, license, or degree, but the person may not indicate that the person’s services are available to the public unless the person holds a current license, practice privilege, permit, or out-or-state exemption under this chapter”, and made related and stylistic changes.

Sec. 08.04.620.
Exceptions.

This chapter does not prohibit

an individual who does not hold a current license or practice privilege from serving as an employee of or as an assistant to an individual or firm holding a current license, a current practice privilege, or a current permit if the employee or assistant does not use the employee’s or assistant’s name in connection with an accounting or financial statement;

an individual who holds a valid license or equivalent authorization in another state from indicating that the individual is entitled to use the title “certified public accountant,” but the individual may not indicate that services are available to the public unless the individual holds a current license or practice privilege issued under this chapter;

a holder of a certificate, license, or degree from a foreign country that entitles the holder to practice public accounting or the equivalent in the foreign country from providing professional services to the government of the country issuing the license, a business whose principal office is located in the foreign country, or a person who is a resident of the foreign country, if the holder of the certificate, license, or degree issued by the foreign country does not perform attest functions, or issue a report regarding an individual, firm, or government of the state, and uses only the title or designation permitted under the certificate, license, or degree issued by the foreign country followed by an English translation.

History.

(§ 16 ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 25 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 19 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 47 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 35 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 35 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.630.
Injunction against unlawful act.

Whenever, in the judgment of the board, a person has engaged in an act that constitutes a violation of AS

08.04.500

—

08.04.610

, the board may apply to the appropriate court for an order enjoining the act. Upon a showing by the board that a person has engaged in the act, the court shall grant an injunction or any other appropriate order without bond.

History.

(§ 17 ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 70 SLA 1964)

Collateral references. —

Right to enjoin business competitor from unlicensed or otherwise illegal acts or practices. 90 ALR2d 7.

Recovery back of money paid to unlicensed person required by law to have occupation or business license or permit to make contract. 74 ALR3d 637.

Sec. 08.04.640.
Penalty.

A person who violates a provision of AS

08.04.500

—

08.04.610

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.

History.

(§ 18 ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 48 ch 16 SLA 2006)

Sec. 08.04.650.
Single act evidence of practice.

The display or uttering by a person of a card, sign, advertisement, or other printed, engraved, or written instrument or device, bearing a person’s name in conjunction with the words “certified public accountant,” or any abbreviation of that phrase, or with the words “public accountant,” or any abbreviation of that phrase, or any words or abbreviations likely to be confused with any of them is prima facie evidence in any action brought under AS

08.04.630

or

08.04.640

that the person whose name is displayed caused the display or uttering of the card, sign, advertisement, or written instrument or device, and that the person is holding out to be a certified public accountant or public accountant. In any action, evidence of the commission of a single act prohibited by this chapter is sufficient to justify an injunction or a conviction without evidence of a general course of conduct.

History.

(§ 18 ch 187 SLA 1960)